Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2,242.04
Commercial food establishment, defined.

Commercial food establishment means an operation with a permanent sales location and such location has more than one hundred cubic feet of area containing food.

Laws 2005, LB 131, § 3.